Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 137. Building Communities Grants

§ 5601.
Building communities grants.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish one-for-one matching grants to help communities, nonprofit organizations, or, as applicable under section 5603 of this chapter, barn owners preserve important historic buildings and enhance community facilities. Therefore, in order to make it easy for communities, nonprofit organizations, or barn owners to apply, the entity which administers a grant program under this chapter shall work with other administrators of building communities grants to develop a standard application form which:

describes the application process and includes clear instructions and examples to help applicants complete the form;

includes an opportunity for a community, nonprofit organization, or barn owner to demonstrate its ability to generate one-for-one matching funds from local fundraising or other efforts;

includes a summary of each of the other grants, their deadlines, and a statement that no community, nonprofit organization, or barn owner shall apply for more than one grant under this chapter for the same project in the same calendar year; and

may include supplements specific to an individual grant.

Each entity which administers a grants program under this chapter shall establish a selection process which ensures equitable selection of grant recipients and ensures accountability by grant recipients.

Before it notifies an applicant of an award under this chapter, the entity which administers the grant shall provide notice of the award and time and location of any award presentation to the Chairs of the Senate Committee on Institutions and the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions, and those members of the General Assembly who represent the area in which a successful applicant resides.

Notwithstanding

32 V.S.A. § 701a

, if, after an entity awards grant funds under this chapter, the funds remain unexpended and not subject to a grant agreement, the entity may reallocate the unexpended funds within its grant program within three years of the original award date. Any unexpended funds remaining after this three-year period that are not subject to a grant agreement shall be reallocated in future acts relating to capital construction and State bonding.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 9, 2008; amended

2009, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 4, 2010;

2011, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. May 7, 2012.

§ 5602.
Historic Preservation Grant Program.

There is established an Historic Preservation Grant Program which shall be administered by the Division for Historic Preservation in the Agency of Commerce and Community Development. Grants shall be made available to municipalities and nonprofit tax-exempt organizations for restoring buildings and structures.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 9, 2008; amended

2009, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.

§ 5603.
Historic Barns Preservation Grant Program.

There is established an Historic Barns Preservation Grant Program which shall be administered by the Division for Historic Preservation in the Agency of Commerce and Community Development. Grants shall be made available to barn owners for restoring historic barns.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 9, 2008; amended

2009, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 4, 2010.

§ 5604.
Cultural Facilities Grant Program.

There is established a Cultural Facilities Competitive Grant Program to be administered by the Vermont Arts Council. No portion of a grant shall be used to pay salaries.

Grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis. In recommending grant awards, a review panel shall give priority consideration to applicants who demonstrate greater financial need or are in underserved areas of the State.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 9, 2008; amended

2009, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 4, 2010.

§ 5605.
Recreational Facilities Grant Program.

Creation of Program. There is created a Recreational Facilities Grant Program to be the successor to and a continuation of the Recreational and Educational Facilities Grant Program established in 2005 Acts and Resolves No. 43, Sec. 34 to provide competitive grants to municipalities as defined in chapter 117 of this title and to nonprofit organizations for capital costs associated with the development and creation of community recreational opportunities in Vermont communities. The Program is authorized to award matching grants of up to $25,000.00 per project. The required match shall be met through dollars raised and not through in-kind services.

Creation of Committee. There is established a Recreational Facilities Grant Advisory Committee to coordinate and administer the Recreational Facilities Grant Program. The Committee shall include the Commissioners of Forests, Parks and Recreation and of Buildings and General Services or the Commissioners’ designees; a representative of the Vermont Recreation and Parks Association; two members of the Vermont General Assembly, one appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees; a representative of the Vermont Trails and Greenways Council; and one citizen member to be appointed by the Governor. The members of the Committee shall select a chair. The citizen member shall serve for a term of two years or until his or her successor is appointed.

Administrative support. The Department of Buildings and General Services shall provide administrative support to the Program.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 9, 2008; amended

2009, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 4, 2010;

2017, No. 74

, § 110.

§ 5606.
Human Services and Educational Facilities Competitive Grant Program.

Creation of Program. There is created a Human Services and Educational Facilities Competitive Grant Program to be the successor to and a continuation of the Human Services Competitive Grant Program established in 2005 Acts and Resolves No. 43, Sec. 36 to provide competitive grants to municipalities as defined in chapter 117 of this title and to nonprofit organizations for capital costs associated with the major maintenance, renovation, or development of facilities for the delivery of human services and health care or for the development of educational opportunities in Vermont communities. The Program is authorized to award matching grants of up to $25,000.00 per project. The required match shall be met through dollars raised and not through in-kind services.

Creation of Committee. There is established a Human Services and Educational Facilities Grant Advisory Committee to administer and coordinate the Human Services and Educational Facilities Grant Program. The Committee shall include the Secretary of Human Services or the Secretary’s designee; the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or the Commissioner’s designee; two members of the Vermont General Assembly, one appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees; and three representatives of broad-based community organizations, such as the United Way of Vermont, who shall be selected and appointed by the Governor. The members of the Committee shall select a chair. The members appointed by the Governor shall serve for terms of two years or until their successors are appointed.

Administrative support. The Department of Buildings and General Services shall provide administrative support to the Program.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. June 9, 2008; amended

2009, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 4, 2010;

2017, No. 74

, § 111.

§ 5607.
Regional Economic Development Grant Program.

Creation of Program. There is created a Regional Economic Development Grant Program to provide competitive grants for capital costs associated with the major maintenance, renovation, or planning related to the development of facilities reasonably expected to create job opportunities in Vermont communities. The Program is authorized to award matching grants of up to $25,000.00 per project. The required match shall be met through dollars raised and not through in-kind services. State investments made under this Program shall be consistent with the goals found in section 4302 of this title and local and regional plans adopted pursuant to this title and shall be coordinated with the efforts described in chapter 76A of this title.

Creation of Committee. There is established a Regional Economic Development Grant Advisory Committee to administer and coordinate the Regional Economic Development Grant Program. The Committee shall include the Commissioner of Economic, Housing and Community Affairs or designee; the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or designee; and two members of the Vermont General Assembly, one appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees. The members of the Committee shall select a chair.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 27a, eff. May 7, 2012; amended

2013, No. 34

, § 16.

§ 5608.
Agricultural Fairs and Field Days Capital Projects Competitive Grants Program.

Grant guidelines. The following guidelines shall apply to capital grants made for Vermont agricultural fairs and field days projects pursuant to this section:

Grants shall be competitively awarded to capital projects that relate to Vermont agricultural fairs and field days operating a minimum of three consecutive, eight-hour days per year.

A project for which a grant is awarded shall have a minimum useful life of 20 years and shall be completed within two years of the execution of a contract to perform work authorized by the grant.

A grant recipient shall contribute matching funds or in-kind services in an amount equal to 15 percent or more of the value of the grant.

There is established an Agricultural Fairs and Field Days Capital Program Advisory Committee to administer and coordinate grants made pursuant to this section. The Committee shall include:

two members appointed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets;

one member appointed by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation;

two members appointed by the Vermont Fair and Field Days Association;

one member appointed by the Vermont Department of Tourism and Marketing;

one member of the Vermont Senate appointed by the Committee on Committees; and

one member of the Vermont House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House.

Administration.

The Advisory Committee created in subsection (b) of this section shall have the authority to award grants in its sole discretion; provided, however, that the Committee may consider whether to award partial awards to all applicants that meet Program criteria established by the Committee.

The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall provide administrative and technical support to the Committee for purposes of administering grants awarded under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, June 9, 2014.

§ 5609.
Repealed. 2015, No. 160 (Adj. Sess.), § 36a, eff. July 1, 2018.